Nebraska, session 109, LB573.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB573 LB573
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 5 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Meat and Poultry Workers and Contractors Protection Act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds that:
(1) Meat and poultry slaughter and processing is a particularly
dangerous occupation, with meat and poultry processing workers suffering
injuries at measurably higher rates than workers in other private sector
industries;
(2) Meat and poultry processing workers face double the rate of
amputations as the average worker in private industry, and injuries such
as sprains, lacerations, and contusions are common among poultry workers;
(3) Meat and poultry processing workers suffer from musculoskeletal
injuries, such as carpal tunnel syndrome, trigger finger, tendinitis,
rotator cuff injuries, lower back injuries, and chronic pain and
numbness, in numbers that can exceed fifty percent of workers;
(4) Higher line speeds in meat and poultry processing facilities are
recognized risk factors that lead to increased risk of both laceration
and musculoskeletal injuries;
(5) Meat and poultry processing work was and continues to be
particularly dangerous as it pertains to contracting and spreading
COVID-19, avian influenza, and other illnesses due to, among other
factors:
(a) The easily transmissible nature of the illnesses via aerosol and
droplets;
(b) The close proximity of meat processing workers;
(c) Cold conditions inside meat processing facilities; and
(d) The pace and physical rigor of meat and poultry processing work;
(6) Enforcement of the requirements of the Occupational Safety and
Health Administration in the meat and poultry processing industry has
been fundamentally inadequate, especially during the COVID-19 pandemic;
(7) In 2024, four cases of avian influenza were confirmed in Gage,
Nemaha, Dodge, Sarpy, and Lancaster counties, with two of the cases
-2-

LB573 LB573
2025 2025
associated with concentration of commercial bird flocks; and
(8) Meat and poultry workers are considered to be essential workers
for maintaining Nebraska's world class, flourishing, and critical
agricultural economy.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Meat and Poultry Workers and
Contractors Protection Act:
(1) Affected contract grower means an owner of a CAFO that raises
livestock or poultry pursuant to a written contract, marketing
arrangement, or other arrangement with a covered industrial operator, and
whose CAFO is impacted by a disaster mitigation event;
(2) Affected contractor means an individual or entity that supplies,
either with or without a contract, a covered industrial operator with a
worker to perform labor directly or indirectly related to a disaster
mitigation event;
(3) CAFO means a concentrated animal feeding operation as defined in
40 C.F.R. 122.23;
(4) Commissioner means the Commissioner of Labor;
(5) Covered industrial operator means a slaughterhouse or
meatpacking plant with over two hundred fifty employees, an enclosed
large CAFO, and any facility required to obtain a National Pollutant
Discharge Elimination System permit as a condition to operate;
(6)(a) Covered worker means an employee who performs labor in
connection with a disaster mitigation event for a covered industrial
operator.
(b) Covered worker includes any employee of an affected contract
grower, or of another affected contractor, of a covered industrial
operator;
(7) Disaster mitigation event means a disaster event affecting a
covered industrial operator that triggers activities described in a
disaster mitigation plan submitted by the covered industrial operator;
(8) Disaster mitigation plan means:
-3-

LB573 LB573
2025 2025
(a) A description of the type, location, and extent of all potential
disaster events that can affect livestock or poultry housed in a high-
risk CAFO, including information on previous occurrences of disaster
events and the probability of future disaster events;
(b) A plan to ensure that animals do not go without necessary
resources such as shelter, food, and water during an extreme weather
event;
(c) A plan to increase flexibility and resiliency, including (i)
identifying ways to house animals past their intended slaughter date and
(ii) alternative slaughter and processing arrangements, including
contracting with small-scale Department of Agriculture, state-certified,
or mobile operations with existing capacity, in the event of supply chain
disruptions;
(d) A plan for accessing necessary resources, personal protective
equipment, and labor to carry out depopulation in ways that most rapidly
render animals unconscious in the event that depopulation is unavoidable;
(e) A plan for disposal of any deceased animals that (i) satisfies
requirements under all relevant federal, state, and local environmental
and public health laws and (ii) does not rely on unlined burial or onsite
incineration;
(f) A plan to mitigate a public health threat associated with
diseases and other ailments spread or contracted through airborne
transmission or contact with humans or animals that have contracted a
disease that results in identified threats to human health, including,
but not limited to, COVID-19 and associated strains and avian influenza;
and
(g) Other information, as determined appropriate by the
commissioner; and
(9) Employee means an individual performing any labor for a covered
industrial operator, including through an affected contract grower or
other affected contractor, unless:
-4-

LB573 LB573
2025 2025
(a) The individual is free from control and direction in connection
with the performance of the labor, both under the contract for the
performance of labor and in fact;
(b) The labor is performed outside the usual course of the business
of the covered industrial operator; and
(c) The individual is customarily engaged in an independently
established trade, occupation, profession, or business of the same nature
as that involved in the labor performed.
Sec. 4. (1) Each covered industrial operator shall submit a
disaster mitigation plan to the commissioner.
(2) During a disaster mitigation event and for a period of not less
than two years following the disaster mitigation event, the covered
industrial operator shall offer each covered worker and affected contract
grower of the covered industrial operator full compensation for any
injury or illness that occurred during the disaster mitigation event
pursuant to the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act.
(3) In the case of a disaster mitigation event, the covered
industrial operator shall provide any covered worker terminated by the
covered industrial operator, or by an affected contract grower or other
affected contractor of the covered industrial operator impacted by the
disaster mitigation event, during the sixty-day period following the
disaster mitigation event with twelve weeks of severance pay, at a weekly
rate equal to the average weekly earnings of the covered worker during
the disaster mitigation event.
(4) In any case in which a covered industrial operator terminates
the contract of an affected contract grower following a disaster
mitigation event, the covered industrial operator shall provide an amount
of lost revenue to the affected contract grower equal to the affected
contract grower's revenue from the covered industrial operator during the
preceding one hundred eighty days.
(5) The commissioner shall receive, investigate, and attempt to
-5-

LB573 LB573
2025 2025
resolve complaints of violations of this section. The commissioner may
assess a civil penalty of up to fifteen thousand dollars against a
covered industrial operator that violates any provision of this section.
(6) Not later than ninety days after the effective date of this act,
the commissioner shall develop a process to monitor compliance with the
requirements of this section that requires covered industrial operators
to provide information to demonstrate such compliance.
(7) A covered industrial operator that employs or contracts with
covered workers, affected contract growers, or other affected contractors
related to a disaster mitigation event shall not discharge, cause to be
discharged, or in any other manner discriminate against any covered
worker or affected contract grower because such covered worker or
affected contract grower (a) has filed any complaint or instituted or
caused to be instituted any proceeding under or related to this section
or (b) has testified or is about to testify in any such proceeding.
(8)(a) An action to recover damages or obtain relief may be
maintained against any covered industrial operator in any court of
competent jurisdiction by one or more covered workers or affected
contract growers for and on behalf of themselves and other similarly
situated covered workers or affected contract growers.
(b) A covered industrial operator who violates this section shall be
liable to each covered worker or affected contract grower that is
aggrieved by the violation for (i) damages in the amount of unpaid wages,
salary, overtime compensation, or other compensation denied or lost by
reason of the violation and (ii) an additional equal amount as liquidated
damages.
(c) In a civil action brought under this subsection in which the
plaintiff prevails, the court shall award the plaintiff reasonable
attorney's fees and costs of the action.
(d) The commissioner may bring an action in any court of competent
jurisdiction to recover damages or obtain relief on behalf of a covered
-6-

LB573 LB573
2025 2025
worker or affected contract grower aggrieved by a violation of this
section.
Sec. 5. (1) The commissioner shall require all covered industrial
operators employing a minimum of twenty-five employees to provide
information to each employee on their rights to collectively bargain and
join or form a union pursuant to 29 C.F.R. Subtitle B, Chapter 1, as well
as sections 6, 7, and 15(a)(3) of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938,
29 U.S.C. 206, 207, and 215(a)(3).
(2) The commissioner shall assess a civil penalty of up to fifteen
thousand dollars against a covered industrial operator that violates any
provision of this section or who is found to have taken part in any acts
of misinformation, intimidation, or wrongful termination against workers
who attempt to or successfully form or join a union.
(3)(a) The commissioner shall appoint a Workers and Contractors Task
Force consisting of the following members:
(i) An attorney with a license to practice in the State of Nebraska
with a proven client list and track record of representing workers and
agricultural corporations;
(ii) Two unionized members representing meat and poultry workers and
contractors; and
(iii) Two members representing the agricultural industry.
(b) The task force shall also include two members of the Agriculture
Committee of the Legislature, to be selected by the chairperson of such
committee. The two legislative members shall be nonvoting members of the
task force and shall not be members of the same political party.
(c) The task force shall meet at least four times per year.
(d) The task force shall also hold three meetings per year with
affected stakeholders and other interested parties. One meeting shall be
held in the eastern part of the state, one in the central part of the
state, and one in the western part of the state. The locations shall be
selected in coordination with the commissioner with input from affected
-7-

LB573 LB573
2025 2025
stakeholders and other interested parties.
(e) The task force shall submit an annual report to the commissioner
and the Legislature evaluating the effectiveness of the Meat and Poultry
Workers and Contractors Protection Act and shall include recommendations
and guidance on how best to enforce and implement the act.
-8-